Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-137
State budget; appropriations bill; increase; when authorized.

The Governor shall also submit to the Legislature, at the same time he or she submits the budget, copies of a tentative bill for all proposed appropriations of the budget clearly itemized and properly classified, for the ensuing appropriation period, and no appropriation shall be made in excess of the items and recommendations contained in the budget unless by a three-fifths vote of the Legislature, but any item or recommendation therein contained may be rejected or decreased in amount.

Laws 1921, c. 210, § 13, p. 749;

C.S.1922, § 7280;

C.S.1929, § 81-313;

R.S.1943, § 81-137;

Laws 1971, LB 28, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 11.